Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43A O.S. 2021, Section 2-101, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101. A. 1. There is hereby established in this
state a Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services.
2. This Department’s governing board shall be the Board of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, and its chief executive
officer shall be the Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance
Abuse Services. The Commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor
with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall serve at the
pleasure of the Governor Board and may be removed or replaced
without cause. Compensation for the Commissioner shall be
determined by the Governor. The Commissioner may be removed from
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1430 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

offi ce by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the members elected to and
constituting each chamber of the Legislature Board.
3. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
shall exercise all functions of the state in relation to the
administration and operation of all state facilities for the care
and treatment of the mentally ill and drug- or alcohol-dependent
persons.
B. All references in the Oklahoma Statutes to the Department of
Mental Health or the Board of Mental Health shall be construed to
refer to the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services or the Board of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services,
respectively.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 23, 2026 - DO PASS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1430 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)